Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB712.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3203 of Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 3203. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *" Attainable bottom." The depth, approved by the department, that can be achieved after a reasonable effort made in good faith is expended to clean out to the total depth.* * *"Reasonable effort." In relation to an operator's action to achieve an attainable bottom, action that cleans out a well to 123456789101112131415161718 at least 200 feet below the coal protective casing or, if no coal protective casing is present, the coal seam or surface casing, whichever is deeper, and continues to clean out the well until an additional 100 feet of well bore cannot be cleaned out within one eight-hour work shift or the total depth of the well is reached.* * *"Total depth." The depth to which a well was originally drilled, subsequently drilled or the depth to which it was plugged back in a manner approved by the department.* * *Section 2. Section 3220 of Title 58 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 3220. Plugging requirements.* * *(a.1) Cement plug at attainable bottom.--In order to comply with subsection (a), the department shall require, at a minimum, that a cement plug of at least 50 feet be set at the attainable bottom of the well bore, the depth and efficacy of the plug be confirmed and the remaining well bore be plugged to the surface with a solid column of cement.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0712PN0726 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223